Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1512.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Right-to-Repair Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Authorized repair provider." As follows:(1) An individual or business entity that has an arrangement with the OEM under which the OEM grants to the individual or business entity a license to use a trade name, 123456789101112131415161718 service mark or other proprietary identifier for the purposes of offering the services of diagnosis, maintenance or repair of equipment under the name of the OEM or other arrangement with the OEM to offer the services on behalf of the OEM.(2) An OEM that offers the services of diagnosis, maintenance or repair of the OEM's own equipment and who does not have an arrangement described under paragraph (1) with an unaffiliated individual or business."Diagnosis." The process of identifying the issue that causes digital electronic equipment to not be in full working order."Digital electronic equipment." A product manufactured for the first time, and first sold or used in this Commonwealth, on or after July 1, 2021, and that depends for its functioning, in whole or in part, on digital electronics embedded in or attached to the product."Documentation." A manual, diagram, reporting output, service code description, schematic diagram or other information used in effecting the services of diagnosis, maintenance or repair of equipment."Fair and reasonable terms." Terms that make documentation, tools or parts available as follows:(1) With respect to documentation, that the documentation is made available by the OEM at no charge, except that when the documentation is requested in physical printed form, a charge may be included for the reasonable, actual costs of preparing and sending the copy.(2) With respect to tools, that the tools are made available by the OEM at no charge and without imposing impediments to access or use of the tools to diagnose, 20250HB1512PN1768 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 maintain or repair and enable full functionality of a device, or in a manner that impairs the efficient and cost-effective performance of the diagnosis, maintenance or repair, except that, when the tool is requested in physical form, a charge may be included for the reasonable, actual costs of preparing and sending the tool.(3) With respect to parts, that the parts are made available by the OEM, either directly or through an authorized repair provider, to independent repair providers and owners at costs and terms that are equivalent to the most reasonable costs and terms under which an OEM offers the parts to an authorized repair provider and which:(i) Accounts for any:(A) discount, rebate, convenient and timely means of delivery, means of enabling fully restored and updated functionality, rights of use or other incentive and preference the OEM offers to an authorized repair provider; or(B) additional cost, burden or impediment the OEM imposes on an owner or independent repair provider.(ii) Is not conditioned on or imposing a substantial obligation or restriction that is not reasonably necessary for enabling the owner or independent repair provider to engage in the diagnosis, maintenance or repair of equipment made by or on behalf of the OEM.(iii) Is not conditioned on an arrangement described under paragraph (1) of the definition of "authorized repair provider.""Independent repair provider." An individual or business 20250HB1512PN1768 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 entity operating in this Commonwealth that is not an authorized repair provider and that is engaged in the services of diagnosis, maintenance or repair of equipment."Maintenance." An act necessary to keep currently working digital electronic equipment in full working order."Medical device." An instrument, apparatus, implement, machine, contrivance, implant or other similar or related article, including a component part or accessory, including a device as defined under 21 U.S.C. § 321(h) (relating to definitions; generally), which is intended for use in the diagnosis of disease or other condition, or in the cure, mitigation, treatment or prevention of disease in humans or other animals."Motor vehicle." A vehicle that is designed for transporting individuals or property on a street or highway and is certified by the motor vehicle manufacturer under all applicable Federal safety and emissions standards and requirements for distribution and sale in the United States."Motor vehicle manufacturer." An individual or business entity operating as a manufacturer, as defined under 75 Pa.C.S. § 102 (relating to definitions)."Original equipment manufacturer" or "OEM." An individual or business entity engaged in the selling, leasing or supplying of new equipment manufactured by or on behalf of itself to an individual or business entity."Owner." An individual or business entity that owns or leases equipment purchased or used in this Commonwealth."Part." A new or used replacement part made available by or to an OEM for the purpose of effecting the maintenance or repair of equipment manufactured by or on behalf of, sold or supplied 20250HB1512PN1768 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 by the OEM."Parts pairing." A manufacturer's practice of using software to identify component parts through a unique identifier."Security and life safety systems and equipment." A product designed to prevent, detect, protect against or respond to security incidents or safety hazards impacting individuals or property, including:(1) A fire alarm.(2) A medical alert.(3) Intrusion detection.(4) Video security.(5) An access control system or device."Tool." A software program, hardware implement or other apparatus used for diagnosis, maintenance or repair of equipment, including software or other mechanisms that:(1) provision, program or pair a new part;(2) calibrate functionality; or(3) perform any other function required to make the product fully functional, including any updates."Trade secret." As defined under 18 Pa.C.S. § 3930 (relating to theft of trade secrets)."Updates." Recommended corrections or adjustments to parts, tools or information that are created and distributed by the OEM and used in offering the services of diagnosis, maintenance or repair of digital electronic equipment."Video game console." A computing device or system and the components and peripherals that are primarily used by consumers for playing video games. The term does not include a general or all-purpose computer such as a desktop computer, laptop, tablet or cell phone.20250HB1512PN1768 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 3. Provision.For equipment and parts for the equipment that are sold or used in this Commonwealth:(1) An OEM shall make available, on fair and reasonable terms, documentation, parts and tools required for the purpose of diagnosis, maintenance or repair, including updates to information, to an independent repair provider or to the owner of the equipment manufactured by or on behalf of or sold or supplied by the OEM. The documentation, parts and tools reference may be made available either directly by an OEM or via an authorized repair provider or authorized third-party provider.(2) Nothing under this section shall require an OEM to make available parts or tools if the parts or tools are no longer available to the OEM.(3) For digital electronic equipment manufactured for the first time and first sold or used in this Commonwealth after July 1, 2021, an OEM may not use parts pairing to:(i) Prevent or inhibit an independent repair provider or an owner from installing or enabling the function of an otherwise functional replacement part or a component of digital electronic equipment, including a replacement part or component, that the OEM has not approved.(ii) Reduce the functionality or performance of digital electronic equipment.(iii) Cause digital electronic equipment to display misleading alerts or warnings about unidentified parts which the owner cannot immediately dismiss.Section 4. Civil penalty.20250HB1512PN1768 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Violation.--A person that violates a provision of this act shall be subject to a civil penalty of not less than $1,000 nor more than $10,000 for each violation. A penalty imposed under this section shall be paid to the Commonwealth.(b) Enforcement.--The Attorney General shall institute a proceeding to recover the civil penalty provided under subsection (a) against any person liable to the Commonwealth for the penalty.Section 5. Limitations and exclusions.(a) Limitations.--Nothing in this act shall:(1) Require an OEM to disclose a trade secret except as necessary to provide, on fair and reasonable terms, any documentation, tool, part or other device or implement used to diagnose, maintain, repair or update digital electronic equipment.(2) Alter the terms of an arrangement in force between an authorized repair provider and an OEM, including the performance or provision of warranty or recall repair work by an authorized repair provider on behalf of an OEM and pursuant to the arrangement, except that a provision in the terms that purports to waive, avoid, restrict or limit the OEM's obligations to comply with this section shall be void and unenforceable.(3) Authorize a person to alter equipment in a manner that the equipment operates in violation of an environmental, safety or other law.(4) Hold an OEM liable for damage or injury caused by an independent repair provider or owner which occurs during the course of the repair, diagnosis or maintenance, including indirect, incidental, special or consequential damage, loss 20250HB1512PN1768 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of data, privacy or profits or liability to use or reduce functionality of the equipment.(5) Require an OEM to warrant repairs provided by independent repair providers or owners.(6) Require an OEM to provide documentation or tools that the OEM uses to perform, at no cost, diagnostic services virtually through telephone, Internet, chat, email or other similar means that do not involve the OEM physically handling the digital electronic equipment, unless the OEM also makes the documentation or tools available to an individual or business that is unaffiliated with the OEM.(7) Require an OEM to provide documentation or tools used exclusively by the OEM for diagnosis, maintenance or repairs completed by machines that operate on several digital electronic equipment products simultaneously if the OEM makes available to owners and independent repair providers sufficient alternative documentation and tools to effect the diagnosis, maintenance or repair of the digital electronic equipment.(8) Require an OEM to provide or make available source code.(9) Invalidate or alter the terms of any agreement between an OEM and an authorized repair provider, including the performance or provision of warranty or recall repair work by an authorized repair provider on behalf of an OEM pursuant to an authorized repair agreement, except that any provision in an authorized repair agreement that purports to waive, avoid, restrict or limit an original manufacturer's compliance with this act shall be void and unenforceable.(b) Exclusions.--Nothing under this act shall apply to:20250HB1512PN1768 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) a motor vehicle manufacturer or a manufacturer of motor vehicle equipment, acting in their capacity as a motor vehicle manufacturer or a manufacturer of motor vehicle equipment;(2) a manufacturer or distributor of a medical device or a digital electronic product or embedded software manufactured for use in a medical setting, including diagnostic, monitoring or control equipment, or a product or service that the manufacturer or distributor of a medical device offers;(3) a manufacturer, distributor, importer or dealer of:(i) off-road equipment, including farm and utility tractors, farm implements and farm machinery;(ii) forestry equipment;(iii) industrial equipment;(iv) utility equipment;(v) construction equipment;(vi) road-building equipment;(vii) compact construction equipment;(viii) mining equipment;(ix) turf, yard and garden equipment;(x) outdoor power equipment, including portable generators;(xi) marine, all-terrain sports and recreational vehicles, including racing vehicles;(xii) stand-alone or integrated stationary or mobile internal combustion engines or other power sources, including generator sets, electric/battery and fuel cell power;(xiii) tools, technology, attachments, accessories, 20250HB1512PN1768 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 components and repair parts for any of the foregoing;(xiv) safety communications equipment, the intended use of which is for emergency response or prevention purposes by an emergency service organization such as a police, fire or medical and emergency rescue services agency; and(xv) security and life safety systems and equipment; or(4) an OEM that provides to the owner of equipment manufactured by or on behalf of, sold or supplied by the OEM, at no charge to the owner:(i) reimbursement of the cost of the equipment; or(ii) equivalent or better, readily available replacement equipment.(c) Construction.--Nothing in this act shall be construed to:(1) Require an OEM or authorized repair provider to make available parts, tools or documentation required for the diagnosis, maintenance or repair of a video game console and its components and peripherals.(2) Require an OEM to make available special documentation, tools and parts that would disable or override privacy or antitheft security measures set by the owner of the product.(3) Alter any federally recognized copyright protection or patent rights granted to the OEM.(4) Prohibit a person from replacing the battery in a residential smoke alarm.Section 6. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 180 days.20250HB1512PN1768 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930